da: Sikringsformfaktor: AGC/3AG-glasrør; ANL (boltmonteret); ATO-sikringsholder / add-a-circuit; Fladsikring (standard ATO/ATC); Keramisk rør; JCASE (lav profil); Mini-fladsikring med lav profil; MCASE (indsats); MEGA (boltmonteret); MIDI (boltmonteret); Maxi-fladsikring; Micro2-fladsikring; Mini-fladsikring (ATM); Andet
hr-HR: Oblik osigurača: Staklena cijev AGC/3AG; ANL (na vijke); ATO priključak osigurača / add-a-circuit; Ubodni (standardni ATO/ATC); Keramička cijev; JCASE (niski profil); Mini ubodni niskog profila; MCASE (uložak); MEGA (na vijke); MIDI (na vijke); Maxi ubodni; Micro2 ubodni; Mini ubodni (ATM); Ostalo
vi: Kiểu dáng thiết kế của cầu chì: Ống thủy tinh AGC/3AG; ANL (bắt bu-lông); Chân cắm cầu chì ATO / mạch gắn thêm; Lưỡi cắm (ATO/ATC tiêu chuẩn); Ống gốm; JCASE (cấu hình thấp); Lưỡi cắm mini cấu hình thấp; MCASE (dạng ống); MEGA (bắt bu-lông); MIDI (bắt bu-lông); Lưỡi cắm Maxi; Lưỡi cắm Micro2; Lưỡi cắm mini (ATM); Khác
lt-LT: Saugiklio formos faktorius: AGC / 3AG stiklinis vamzdelis; ANL (prisukamas); ATO saugiklių šakotuvas / papildoma grandinė; Plokščias (standartinis ATO / ATC); Keraminis vamzdelis; JCASE (žemo profilio); Žemo profilio mini plokščias; MCASE (kasetinis); MEGA (prisukamas); MIDI (prisukamas); Maksi plokščias; Micro2 plokščias; Mini plokščias (ATM); Kita
de: Sicherungsformfaktor: AGC/3AG-Glasrohr; ANL (zum Anschrauben); ATO-Sicherungsabgriff / Add-a-Circuit; Flachstecksicherung (Standard ATO/ATC); Keramikrohr; JCASE (Low Profile); Low-Profile Mini-Flachstecksicherung; MCASE (Kartusche); MEGA (zum Anschrauben); MIDI (zum Anschrauben); Maxi-Flachstecksicherung; Micro2-Flachstecksicherung; Mini-Flachstecksicherung (ATM); Sonstige
th: รูปแบบฟิวส์: หลอดแก้ว AGC/3AG; ANL (ยึดน็อต); แทปฟิวส์ ATO / แอดอะเซอร์กิต; เบลด (มาตรฐาน ATO/ATC); หลอดเซรามิก; JCASE (ทรงเตี้ย); มินิเบลดทรงเตี้ย; MCASE (คาร์ทริดจ์); MEGA (ยึดน็อต); MIDI (ยึดน็อต); แม็กซีเบลด; ไมโครทูเบลด; มินิเบลด (ATM); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblika ohišja varovalke: Steklena cevka AGC/3AG; ANL (na vijak); Odcep za varovalko ATO / dodan tokokrog; Ploščata (standardna ATO/ATC); Keramična cevka; JCASE (nizki profil); Ploščata nizkoprofilna mini; MCASE (kasetna); MEGA (na vijak); MIDI (na vijak); Ploščata maksi; Ploščata micro2; Ploščata mini (ATM); Drugo
sk-SK: Konštrukčné vyhotovenie poistky: Sklenená trubička AGC/3AG; ANL (skrutkovacia); Odbočka poistky ATO / pridanie obvodu; Nožová (štandardná ATO/ATC); Keramická trubička; JCASE (nízkoprofilová); Nízkoprofilová mini nožová; MCASE (patróna); MEGA (skrutkovacia); MIDI (skrutkovacia); Maxi nožová; Micro2 nožová; Mini nožová (ATM); Iné
ro-RO: Factorul de formă al siguranței fuzibile: Tub de sticlă AGC/3AG; ANL (cu prindere cu șuruburi); Derivație siguranță ATO / add-a-circuit; Lamelară (standard ATO/ATC); Tub ceramic; JCASE (profil redus); Lamelară mini cu profil redus; MCASE (cartuș); MEGA (cu prindere cu șuruburi); MIDI (cu prindere cu șuruburi); Lamelară maxi; Lamelară Micro2; Lamelară mini (ATM); Altele
es: Factor de forma del fusible: Tubo de vidrio AGC/3AG; ANL (atornillado); Adaptador de fusible ATO/agrega un circuito; De cuchilla (ATO/ATC estándar); Tubo de cerámica; JCASE (perfil bajo); Minicuchilla de perfil bajo; MCASE (cartucho); MEGA (atornillado); MIDI (atornillado); Maxicuchilla; Cuchilla Micro2; Minicuchilla (ATM); Otro
pl: Współczynnik kształtu bezpiecznika: Szklana rurka AGC/3AG; ANL (przykręcany); Złodziejka bezpiecznika ATO; Płytkowy (standardowy ATO/ATC); Rurka ceramiczna; JCASE (niskoprofilowy); Płytkowy mini niskoprofilowy; MCASE (kasetowy); MEGA (przykręcany); MIDI (przykręcany); Płytkowy maxi; Płytkowy Micro2; Płytkowy mini (ATM); Inny
pt-BR: Fator de forma do fusível: Tubo de vidro AGC/3AG; ANL (aparafusado); Adaptador de fusível ATO/expansor de circuito; Lâmina (padrão ATO/ATC); Tubo de cerâmica; JCASE (perfil baixo); Mini lâmina de perfil baixo; MCASE (cartucho); MEGA (aparafusado); MIDI (aparafusado); Lâmina maxi; Lâmina Micro2; Mini lâmina (ATM); Outro
it: Fattore di forma del fusibile: Tubo di vetro AGC/3AG; ANL (imbullonato); Rubacorrente per fusibili ATO / Aggiungi un circuito; A lama (ATO/ATC standard); Tubo in ceramica; JCASE (basso profilo); Minilama a basso profilo; MCASE (a cartuccia); MEGA (imbullonato); MIDI (imbullonato); Maxilama; Lama Micro2; Minilama (ATM); Altro
sv: Säkring – format: AGC/3AG-glasrör; ANL (fastskruvad); ATO-säkringstjuv / tilläggskrets; Flatsäkring (standard ATO/ATC); Keramiskt rör; JCASE (lågprofil); Lågprofil mini flatsäkring; MCASE (insats); MEGA (fastskruvad); MIDI (fastskruvad); Maxi flatsäkring; Micro2 flatsäkring; Mini flatsäkring (ATM); Övrigt
hu: Biztosíték formatényezője: AGC/3AG üvegcsöves; ANL (csavaros); ATO biztosítékleágazás / áramkörbővítő; Késes (normál ATO/ATC); Kerámiacsöves; JCASE (alacsony profilú); Alacsony profilú mini késes; MCASE (patronos); MEGA (csavaros); MIDI (csavaros); Maxi késes; Micro2 késes; Mini késes (ATM); Egyéb
ja: フューズフォームファクター: AGC/3AGガラス管; ANL (ボルトダウン); ATOヒューズタップ / アド・ア・サーキット; ブレード (標準ATO/ATC); セラミック管; JCASE (ロープロファイル); ロープロファイルミニブレード; MCASE (カートリッジ); MEGA (ボルトダウン); MIDI (ボルトダウン); マキシブレード; Micro2ブレード; ミニブレード (ATM); その他
cs: Formát pojistky: Skleněná trubička AGC/3AG; ANL (šroubovací); Odbočka pojistky ATO / přídavný obvod; Nožová (standardní ATO/ATC); Keramická trubička; JCASE (nízký profil); Nožová mini s nízkým profilem; MCASE (patrona); MEGA (šroubovací); MIDI (šroubovací); Nožová maxi; Nožová Micro2; Nožová mini (ATM); Ostatní
en: Fuse form factor: AGC/3AG glass tube; ANL (bolt-down); ATO fuse tap / add-a-circuit; Blade (standard ATO/ATC); Ceramic tube; JCASE (low profile); Low-profile mini blade; MCASE (cartridge); MEGA (bolt-down); MIDI (bolt-down); Maxi blade; Micro2 blade; Mini blade (ATM); Other
zh-CN: 保险丝外形规格: AGC/3AG 玻璃管; ANL（螺栓固定）; ATO 保险丝取电器/增加电路; 插片式（标准 ATO/ATC）; 陶瓷管; JCASE（薄型）; 薄型迷你插片式; MCASE（管壳式）; MEGA（螺栓固定）; MIDI（螺栓固定）; 大号插片式; Micro2 插片式; 迷你插片式 (ATM); 其他
fr: Format de fusible: Tube en verre AGC/3AG; ANL (à boulonner); Prise fusible ATO / ajout de circuit; À lame (ATO/ATC standard); Tube en céramique; JCASE (profil bas); Mini lame à profil bas; MCASE (cartouche); MEGA (à boulonner); MIDI (à boulonner); Maxi lame; Lame Micro2; Mini lame (ATM); Autre
zh-TW: 保險絲外型規格: AGC/3AG 玻璃管; ANL (螺栓固定); ATO 保險絲跨接線 / 擴充線路; 刀片型 (標準 ATO/ATC); 陶瓷管; JCASE (薄型); 薄型迷你刀片; MCASE (插片式); MEGA (螺栓固定); MIDI (螺栓固定); 大型刀片; Micro2 刀片; 迷你刀片 (ATM); 其他
el: Παράγοντας μορφής ασφάλειας: Γυάλινος σωλήνας AGC/3AG; ANL (βιδωτή); Κλέφτης ρεύματος ATO / add-a-circuit; Μαχαιρωτή (τυπική ATO/ATC); Κεραμικός σωλήνας; JCASE (χαμηλού προφίλ); Μίνι μαχαιρωτή χαμηλού προφίλ; MCASE (φυσίγγιο); MEGA (βιδωτή); MIDI (βιδωτή); Μαχαιρωτή Maxi; Μαχαιρωτή Micro2; Μίνι μαχαιρωτή (ATM); Άλλο
fi: Sulakkeen muototekijä: AGC/3AG-lasiputki; ANL (pultattava); ATO-sulakehaaroitin / lisäpiiri; Latta (standardi ATO/ATC); Keraaminen putki; JCASE (matalaprofiilinen); Matalaprofiilinen mini-latta; MCASE (patruuna); MEGA (pultattava); MIDI (pultattava); Maxi-latta; Micro2-latta; Mini-latta (ATM); Muu
bg-BG: Типоразмер на предпазителя: Стъклена тръба AGC/3AG; ANL (с болт); ATO конектор за предпазител/add-a-circuit; Плосък (стандартен ATO/ATC); Керамична тръба; JCASE (нисък профил); Мини плосък (нисък профил); MCASE (тип патрон); MEGA (с болт); MIDI (с болт); Макси плосък; Micro2 плосък; Мини плосък (ATM); Друго
nl: Vormfactor zekering: AGC/3AG glazen buis; ANL (aanschroefbaar); ATO-zekeringaftakking / add-a-circuit; Steekzekering (standaard ATO/ATC); Keramische buis; JCASE (low-profile); Low-profile mini-steekzekering; MCASE (patroon); MEGA (aanschroefbaar); MIDI (aanschroefbaar); Maxi-steekzekering; Micro2-steekzekering; Mini-steekzekering (ATM); Anders
nb: Formfaktor for sikring: AGC/3AG-glassrør; ANL (fastskrudd); ATO strømtyv / ekstra krets; Blad (standard ATO/ATC); Keramisk rør; JCASE (lav profil); Mini-blad med lav profil; MCASE (patron); MEGA (fastskrudd); MIDI (fastskrudd); Maxi-blad; Micro2-blad; Mini-blad (ATM); Annet
tr: Sigorta form faktörü: AGC/3AG cam tüp; ANL (cıvatalı); ATO sigorta tapası / devre ekleyici; Bıçak (standart ATO/ATC); Seramik tüp; JCASE (düşük profil); Düşük profilli mini bıçak; MCASE (kartuş); MEGA (cıvatalı); MIDI (cıvatalı); Maksi bıçak; Micro2 bıçak; Mini bıçak (ATM); Diğer
ru: Формфактор предохранителя: Стеклянная трубка AGC/3AG; ANL (на болтах); Переходник-разветвитель для предохранителя ATO; Флажковый (стандартный ATO/ATC); Керамическая трубка; JCASE (низкопрофильный); Низкопрофильный мини-флажковый; MCASE (картридж); MEGA (на болтах); MIDI (на болтах); Макси-флажковый; Флажковый Micro2; Мини-флажковый (ATM); Другое
ko: 퓨즈 폼 팩터: AGC/3AG 유리관; ANL(볼트다운); ATO 퓨즈 탭 / 퓨즈 홀더 추가; 블레이드(표준 ATO/ATC); 세라믹 튜브; JCASE(로우 프로파일); 로우 프로파일 미니 블레이드; MCASE(카트리지); MEGA(볼트다운); MIDI(볼트다운); 맥시 블레이드; 마이크로2 블레이드; 미니 블레이드(ATM); 기타
pt-PT: Formato do fusível: Tubo de vidro AGC/3AG; ANL (aparafusado); Derivação de fusível ATO/adicionar um circuito; Lâmina (ATO/ATC padrão); Tubo de cerâmica; JCASE (baixo perfil); Minilâmina de baixo perfil; MCASE (cartucho); MEGA (aparafusado); MIDI (aparafusado); Maxilâmina; Lâmina Micro2; Minilâmina (ATM); Outro